apertium-evn.evn-relaxed.lexc
LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ми CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ду%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<all%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>тыки%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<locall%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>дулэ%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<prl%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>дули%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>иклэ%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}%>клэ%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>икли%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}%>кли%{ː%}%>ви CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>дук%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ди%>ви CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ӈит%>ви CLITICS ; ! this form is in Nedjalkov, but not in Boldyrev
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<com-nun%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>нун%>ми CLITICS ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<datloc%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>ду%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<all%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>тыки%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<locall%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>дулэ%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<prl%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>дули%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>иклэ%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}%>клэ%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>икли%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}%>кли%{ː%}%>вэр CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>дук%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>ди%>вэр CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>гит%>вэр CLITICS ; ! this form is in Nedjalkov, but not in Boldyrev
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<com-nun%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>нун%>мэр CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-PERS-CASES

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:%>%{i%}т%{д%} POSS-SG-CLITICS ;
%<com-nun%>:%>нун POSS-SG-N-CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-PERS

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px1sg%>:н%>ми CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px1sg%>:м CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px2sg%>:н%>ни CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px3sg%>:н%>ин CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>:н PRON-REF-PERS-CASES ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px1pe%>:%>р%>вун CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px1pi%>:%>р%>ты CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px2pl%>:%>р%>рун CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>р PRON-PERS-3-PL-PX ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%>р PRON-REF-PERS-CASES ;

LEXICON A-INFL

NOMINAL-INFL ;

%<comp%>:%>%{D%}%{ы%}м%{Э%}р NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<sup%>:%>%{D%}%{ы%}%{G%}у NOMINAL-INFL ;

%<ints1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%}ку NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR

%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten2%>:%>ми NOMINAL-INFL-N ;

%<advz-mat%>:%>м%{Э%}т ADV ;
%<advz-t%>:%>т ADV ;

LEXICON A

A-INFL ;
%<pču%>:%>пчу A-INFL ; ! form adjectives from qualitative adjectives

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: A ;

LEXICON A-N-INFL

NOMINAL-INFL-N ;

%<comp%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}м%{Э%}р NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<sup%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}%{G%}у NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<sup%>:н%>%{D%}%{ы%}%{G%}у NOMINAL-INFL ;

%<ints1%>:н%>к%{Э%}ку%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<ints2%>:н%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

%<atten1%>:н%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<atten1%>:н%>к%{Э%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten2%>:н%>ми NOMINAL-INFL-N ;

%<advz-mat%>:н%>м%{Э%}т ADV ;
%<advz-t%>:н%>ди ADV ;

LEXICON A-N

A-N-INFL ;
%<pču%>:пчу A-N-INFL ; ! form adjectives from qualitative adjectives

LEXICON ADJ-N

%<adj%>: A-N ;

LEXICON NP

%<np%>: N ;

LEXICON NP-N

%<np%>: N-N ;

LEXICON ABBR-INFL

%<abbr%>: NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<abbr%>:%- NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

!===================!
! Verbal inflection !
!===================!

LEXICON V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}м CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}м%{Э%} CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{i%}нни CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ндэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL

%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>н CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>п CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>нни CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ндэ CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>н CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>п CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>т CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-2-WITHOUT-P3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>т CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>лты CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>сун CLITICS ;

!LEXICON V-PERS-2-P1PI-P3PL

!%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>п CLITICS ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>н CLITICS ; ! или опечатка на p.263?

LEXICON V-PERS-2

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>в CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>н CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pe%>:%>вун CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>т CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pi%>:%>лты CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>сун CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>тын CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>тин CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON IRREG

NFUT ;
%<nfut-irreg%>:д%{Э%}%{ː%} V-PERS-1 ;
%<p-neg%>:%>да CLITICS ;
%<conv-cond-ds%>:%>д%{Э%}к POSS-SG-PX ; ! contextual anteriority

LEXICON PRES

%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%} V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG ;
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ;
%<pres%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ;

LEXICON NFUT

%<nfut%>: V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG ;
%<nfut%>:%>%{r%}%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ;
%<nfut%>:%>%{r%}%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ;

LEXICON FUTCNT

%<futcnt%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%} V-PERS-1-P1P2-SG ;
%<futcnt%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%} V-PERS-1-P3SG-P1PI-P2PL ;
%<futcnt%>:%>%{D%}%{Е%}р%{Э%} V-PERS-1-P1PE-P3PL ;

 LEXICON Adjectives 
аӣтчарӣ:аи%{ː%}тчари%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
ала̄нчэн:ала%{ː%}нчэ ADJ-N ; ! 
американскай:американскай ADJ ; ! 
аракӯка̄н:араку%{ː%}ка%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
асады:асады ADJ ; ! 
аяман:аяма ADJ-N ; ! 
багдака̄чӣ:багдака%{ː%}чи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
баян:бая ADJ-N ; ! 
безрезультатнэй:безрезультатнэй ADJ ; ! 
боӈнарипчу:боӈнарипчу ADJ ; ! 
бургу:бургу%{э%} ADJ ; ! "жирный, толстый"! added from freq_list бургуе
бучукин:бучуки%{а%}н ADJ-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
ваӈгай:ваӈгай ADJ ; ! 
гвардейскэй:гвардейскэй ADJ ; ! 
гиркӣлэ̄н:гирки%{ː%}лэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
горопты̄:горопты%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
давла̄мэ:давла%{ː%}мэ ADJ ; ! 
дагака̄н:дагака%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
дёкилды̄дярӣ:дёкилды%{ː%}дяри%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
доколомнӣ:доколомни%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
доӈкорин:доӈкори ADJ-N ; ! 
дыламкӯн:дыламку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
дылгуксачӣ:дылгуксачи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
дюлэ̄скӣпты:дюлэ%{ː%}ски%{ː%}пты ADJ ; ! 
дю̄нмэ̄н:дю%{ː%}нмэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
екэ̄ды:екэ%{ː%}ды ADJ ; ! 
золотомоптыкин:золотомоптыки ADJ-N ; ! 
инёмэчэе:инёмэчэе ADJ ; ! 
инӣкин:ини%{ː%}ки%{э%}н ADJ-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
калбин:калби ADJ-N ; ! 
кандарипчу:кандарипчу ADJ ; ! 
коӈгалбӯма:коӈгалбу%{ː%}ма ADJ ; ! 
коӈномоко̄н:коӈномоко%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
лагерьды:лагерьды ADJ ; ! 
лирбирин:лирбири ADJ-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
математикады:математикады ADJ ; ! 
мокчорӣн:мокчори%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
муӈку:муӈку ADJ ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
мэкэпчэкэ̄н:мэкэпчэкэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
наптарин:наптари ADJ-N ; ! 
не̄ма:не%{ː%}ма ADJ ; ! 
нисимкӯкэ̄н:нисимку%{ː%}кэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нэмкӯн:нэмку%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
нюӈэгу:нюӈэгу ADJ ; ! 
нялакин:нялаки ADJ-N ; ! 
ӈэ̄лэн:ӈэ%{ː%}лэ ADJ-N ; ! 
ӈэ̄рӣпчу:ӈэ%{ː%}ри%{ː%}пчу ADJ ; ! 
олтан:олта ADJ-N ; ! 
пиянил:пиянил ADJ ; ! 
сагдыды:сагдыды ADJ ; ! 
са̄лдыган:са%{ː%}лдыга ADJ-N ; ! 
сиӈарӣн:сиӈари%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
со̄дыг:со%{ː%}дыг ADJ ; ! 
сулэ̄н:сулэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
сэвэмэ:сэвэмэ ADJ ; ! 
сэрипчэлэ̄н:сэрипчэлэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
трансформаторды:трансформаторды ADJ ; ! 
тугэн:тугэ ADJ-N ; ! 
туюлэ̄н:туюлэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
тыптара̄:тыптара%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
тэндыкэ̄чэн:тэндыкэ%{ː%}чэ ADJ-N ; ! 
ӯкчэгэчин:у%{ː%}кчэгэчи ADJ-N ; ! 
улэ̄ккӣвкӣ:улэ%{ː%}кки%{ː%}вки%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
уӈивун:уӈиву ADJ-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
учӣлгэ:учи%{ː%}лгэ ADJ ; ! 
хавалӣвун:хавали%{ː%}ву ADJ-N ; ! 
хойды:хойды ADJ ; ! 
холмилэ̄н:холмилэ%{ː%} ADJ-N ; ! 
хуӈтумусин:хуӈтумуси ADJ-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
хэӈкэчивкӣ:хэӈкэчивки%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
хеглан:хегла ADJ-N ; ! 
чирги:чирги%{а%} ADJ ; ! ! added from freq_list чиргиналчатын
чултын:чулты ADJ-N ; ! ! couldn't find in freq_list
эвэнскай:эвэнскай ADJ ; ! 
элэ̄птыкин:элэ%{ː%}птыки ADJ-N ; ! 
э̄сактура̄:э%{ː%}сактура%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Акишинадук:Акишинадук NP ;
Амаскиви:Амаскиви NP ;
Амелькин:Амельки NP-N ;
Антоноввава:Антоноввава NP ;
Арсен:Арсе NP-N ;
Асуканэ:Асуканэ NP ;
Бакадям:Бакадям NP ;
Бегакан:Бегака NP-N ;
Биденгос:Биденгос NP ;
Бисин:Биси NP-N ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Борони:Борони NP ;
Буниц:Буниц NP ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Бэеткочэн:Бэеткочэ NP-N ;
Бюродук:Бюродук NP ;
Верхотуров:Верхотуров NP ;
Гагарин:Гагари NP-N ;
Гаралдивар:Гаралдивар NP ;
Губернаторнун:Губернаторну NP-N ;
Гулэду:Гулэду NP ;
Гущин:Гущи NP-N ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Дергэлдин:Дергэлди NP-N ;
Дмитриевич:Дмитриевич NP ;
Дюктэкокэн:Дюктэкокэ NP-N ;
Дявракаткэл:Дявракаткэл NP ;
Елкин:Елки NP-N ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Жилищнай:Жилищнай NP ;
Землянкин:Землянки NP-N ;
Илимпиедылэ:Илимпиедылэ NP ;
Илэлнун:Илэлну NP-N ;
Ичесинэн:Ичесинэ NP-N ;
Казахстанмэ:Казахстанмэ NP ;
Кидан:Кида NP-N ;
Киринискэло:Киринискэло NP ;
Константин:Константи NP-N ;
Красной:Красной NP ;
Кутукин:Кутуки NP-N ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Лаврентьевнат:Лаврентьевнат NP ;
Лэмун:Лэму NP-N ;
Мамонтовойду:Мамонтовойду NP ;
Мезенин:Мезени NP-N ;
Мишэ:Мишэ NP ;
Моисеевнун:Моисеевну NP-N ;
Мэкигдун:Мэкигду NP-N ;
Некэӈне:Некэӈне NP ;
Никитин:Никити NP-N ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Нунгандукин:Нунгандуки NP-N ;
Някшинда:Някшинда NP ;
Овдан:Овда NP-N ;
Осиктакандула:Осиктакандула NP ;
Остан:Оста NP-N ;
Паша:Паша NP ;
Петронун:Петрону NP-N ;
Подпорожнай:Подпорожнай NP ;
Пурнука̄н:Пурнука%{ː%} NP-N ;
Роста:Роста NP ;
Салаткин:Салатки NP-N ;
Сидоркинай:Сидоркинай NP ;
Симургачан:Симургача NP-N ;
Сонингин:Сонинги NP-N ;
Стрелка:Стрелка NP ;
Сэвэкинун:Сэвэкину NP-N ;
Тарбаду:Тарбаду NP ;
Тойтун:Тойту NP-N ;
Турастройдук:Турастройдук NP ;
Улгукиду:Улгукиду NP ;! couldn't find in freq_list
Улгукичэн:Улгукичэ NP-N ;
Фомич:Фомич NP ;
Ханнгукталлан:Ханнгукталла NP-N ;
Хутокогир:Хутокогир NP ;
Хутэкэн:Хутэкэ NP-N ;
Чипаду:Чипаду NP ;
Эвидечов:Эвидечов NP ;
Эдэвун:Эдэву NP-N ;
Эсакурин:Эсакури NP-N ;
Этпи:Этпи NP ;! couldn't find in freq_list
мэндерка:мэндерка NP ;
 LEXICON Abbreviations
А:А ABBR ;
АПК:АПК ABBR-INFL ;
Б:Б ABBR ;
В:В ABBR ;
ВДНХ:ВДНХ ABBR-INFL ;
ВДНХа:ВДНХа ABBR-INFL ;
ВЛКкСМ:ВЛКкСМ ABBR-INFL ;! couldn't find in freq_list
ВЛКСМ:ВЛКСМ ABBR-INFL ;
Г:Г ABBR ;
Д:Д ABBR ;
ДЭГСРО:ДЭГСРО ABBR-INFL ;
ДЮКФП:ДЮКФП ABBR-INFL ;
Е:Е ABBR ;
ЕГЭ:ЕГЭ ABBR-INFL ;
Ж:Ж ABBR ;
ЖКУ:ЖКУ ABBR-INFL ;
ЖКХ:ЖКХ ABBR-INFL ;
З:З ABBR ;
ЗАО:ЗАО ABBR-INFL ;
ЗС:ЗС ABBR-INFL ;
И:И ABBR ;
К:К ABBR ;
КкПСС:КкПСС ABBR-INFL ;! couldn't find in freq_list
КМНСС:КМНСС ABBR-INFL ;
Л:Л ABBR ;
М:М ABBR ;
МВД:МВД ABBR-INFL ;
МВт:МВт ABBR-INFL ;! couldn't find in freq_list
МДОУ:МДОУ ABBR-INFL ;
МОУ:МОУ ABBR-INFL ;
МСУ:МСУ ABBR-INFL ;
МУП:МУП ABBR-INFL ;
Н:Н ABBR ;
НИИСХ:НИИСХ ABBR-INFL ;
О:О ABBR ;
ОБЖ:ОБЖ ABBR-INFL ;
ОВОС:ОВОС ABBR-INFL ;
ОГПУ:ОГПУ ABBR-INFL ;
ОМС:ОМС ABBR-INFL ;
ООО:ООО ABBR-INFL ;
ОЦЭК:ОЦЭК ABBR-INFL ;
П:П ABBR ;
Р:Р ABBR ;
С:С ABBR ;
Т:Т ABBR ;
УАЗ:УАЗ ABBR-INFL ;
УИК:УИК ABBR-INFL ;
УФМС:УФМС ABBR-INFL ;
Ф:Ф ABBR ;
Х:Х ABBR ;
ЦИК:ЦИК ABBR-INFL ;
ЦСС:ЦСС ABBR-INFL ;
ЧС:ЧС ABBR-INFL ;
Э:Э ABBR ;
ЭКОЦИД:ЭКОЦИД ABBR-INFL ;
ЭОУЭК:ЭОУЭК ABBR-INFL ;
ЭОЭЦПК:ЭОЭЦПК ABBR-INFL ;
ЭРКД:ЭРКД ABBR-INFL ;
Ю:Ю ABBR ;
Я:Я ABBR ;
